District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-912

Meetings; regular and special — Units of membership.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 484, ch. 397, § 12
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-912.
1981 Ed., § 29-1112.
1973 Ed., § 29-812.